North Dakota, session 69, HB1304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Accused individual" means a lobbyist, public official, candidate for public office,
political committee, or contributor who is alleged to have violated article XIV of the
Constitution of North Dakota, this chapter, or another law or rule regarding
transparency, corruption, elections, or lobbying.
2. "Complainant" means an individual who, in writing or verbally, submits a complaint to
the commission and is:
a. A North Dakota resident;
b. Subject to licensing by a state agency or other public official subject to the
jurisdiction of the ethics commission; or
c. A party to a quasi-judicial proceeding before a state agency or other public official
subject to the jurisdiction of the ethics commission.
3. "Complaint" means a verbal or written allegation to the commission that a lobbyist,
public official, candidate for public office, political committee, or contributor has
violated article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota, this chapter, or another law or
rule regarding transparency, corruption, elections, or lobbying.
Page No. 1 25.0226.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. "Ethics commission" or "commission" means the North Dakota ethics commission
established by article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota.
5. "Gift" means any item, service, or thing of value not given in exchange for fair market
consideration including travel and recreation, except:
a. Purely informational material;
b. A campaign contribution; and
c. An item, service, or thing of value given under conditions that do not raise ethical
concerns, as set forth in rules adopted by the ethics commission, to advance
opportunities for state residents to meet with public officials in educational and
social settings in the state.
6. "Influence state government action" means promoting or opposing the adoption of a
rule by an administrative agency or the commission under chapter 28-32.
7. "Lobby" means an activity listed in subsection 1 of section 54-05.1-02.
8. "Lobbyist" means an individual required to register under section 54-05.1-03.
9. "Ou t - o f - state educational event" means an event, which may include a socia l
component, held out of state to provide objective, educational materials to a member
of the legislative assembly.
10. "Public official" means an elected or appointed official of the state's executive or
legislative branch, members of the commission, members of the governor's cabinet,
and employees of the legislative branch.
10.11. "Receives the complaint" means one or more members of the commission learn of the
complaint.
11.12. "Ultimate and true source" means the person that knowingly contributed over two
hundred dollars solely to lobby or influence state government action.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-03. Lobbyist gifts - Exception - Penalty.
1. A lobbyist may not give, offer, solicit, initiate, or facilitate a gift knowingly to a public
official for the purpose of lobbying the public official, and a public official may not
accept a gift from a lobbyist in conjunction with an effort by the lobbyist to knowingly
lobby the public official.
Page No. 2 25.0226.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. The prohibition in subsection 1 does not apply when a:
a. A lobbyist gives, offers, solicits, initiates, or facilitates, or a public official accepts
a gift to or from a family member; or
b. A member of the legislative assembly attends an ou t - o f - state educational event in
accordance with subsection 3 .
3. A member of the legislative assembly:
a. May attend an ou t - o f - state educational event based on a good-faith belief the
event is objective and educational, as demonstrated by the information provided
to the member of the legislative assembly.
b. May not engage with unforeseen lobbying efforts at the ou t - o f - state educationa l
event. If a member of the legislative assembly identifies lobbying efforts, the
member shall leave the event or pay market value to participate in the event or
portion of the event that includes lobbying.
4. The commission may assess a civil penalty upon any individual who violates this
section.
a. If the gift has a value of five hundred dollars or more, the civil penalty may be up
to two times the value of the gift.
b. If the gift has a value of less than five hundred dollars, the civil penalty may be
two times the value of the gift and may be up to one thousand dollars.
Page No. 3 25.0226.01000